California, session 20252026, SB1059.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10200 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:10200. (a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:(1) California’s economy is being challenged by competition from other states and overseas. In order to meet this challenge, California’s employers, workers, labor organizations, and government need to invest in a skilled and productive workforce, and in developing the skills of frontline workers. For purposes of this section, “frontline worker” means a worker who directly produces or delivers goods or services.(2) The purpose of this chapter is to establish a strategically designed employment training program to promote a healthy labor market in a growing, competitive economy that shall fund only projects that meet the following criteria:(A) Foster creation of high-wage, high-skilled jobs, or foster retention of high-wage, high-skilled jobs in manufacturing and other industries that are threatened by out-of-state and global competition, including, but not limited to, those industries in which targeted training resources for California’s small- and medium-sized business suppliers will increase the state’s competitiveness to secure federal, private sector, and other nonstate funds, and, in addition, provide for retraining contracts in companies that make a monetary or in-kind contribution to the funded training enhancements.(B) Encourage industry-based investment in human resources development that promotes the competitiveness of California industry through productivity and product quality enhancements.(C) Result in secure jobs for those who successfully complete training. All training shall be customized to the specific requirements of one or more employers or a discrete industry and shall include general skills, including soft skills, that trainees can use in the future.(D) Supplement, rather than displace, funds available through existing programs conducted by employers and government-funded training programs, such as the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.), the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (Public Law 98-524), CalWORKs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the former Enterprise Zone Act (Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 7070) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), and the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), the California Community Colleges Economic Development Program, or apportionment funds allocated to the community colleges, regional occupational centers and programs, or other local educational agencies.(3) The Employment Training Panel, also known as ETP, housed within the Employment Development Department, plays a critical role in advancing a healthy labor market in a growing and competitive California economy.(4) Certain statutory and regulatory requirements governing ETP recordkeeping, training delivery nomenclature, and program administration are outdated or no longer reflective of modern workforce training and recordkeeping practices.(5) Modernizing ETP statutes to expressly authorize electronic recordkeeping, digital training attendance tracking, and updated program terminology will improve clarity, consistency, administrative efficiency, and program performance while reducing unnecessary administrative burden.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish an employment training program that promotes a healthy labor market in a growing, competitive economy and that funds be expended only for projects that meet all existing minimum standards under current law.(c) The ETP, in funding projects that meet the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), shall give funding priority to those projects that best meet the following goals:(1) Result in the growth of the California economy by stimulating exports from the state and the production of goods and services that would otherwise be imported from outside the state.(2) Train new employees of firms locating or expanding in the state that provide high-skilled, high-wage jobs and are committed to an ongoing investment in the training of frontline workers.(3) Develop workers with skills necessary to work with new technologies or methods.(4) Train workers who have been displaced, have received notification of impending layoff, or are subject to displacement, because of a plant closure, workforce reduction, changes in technology, or significantly increasing levels of international and out-of-state competition.(5) Are jointly developed by business management and worker representatives.(6) Develop high road, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 14005, jobs and career ladders for workers with demonstrated wage progression and demonstrate high road training partnership, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 14005, standards to ensure job quality.(7) Promote the retention and expansion of the state’s manufacturing workforce.(8) Promote the hiring, training, and advancement of disadvantaged, marginalized, and underrepresented workers.(d) The program established through this chapter is to be coordinated with all existing employment training programs and economic development programs, including, but not limited to, programs such as the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.), the California Community Colleges, the regional occupational programs, vocational education programs, joint labor-management training programs, and related programs under the Employment Development Department, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, the California Housing and Homelessness Agency, and the Business and Consumer Services Agency.(e) Projects funded under this chapter may include programs to provide training through apprenticeship programs that are registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.SEC. 2. Section 10203.5 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:10203.5. (a) The panel shall modernize project administration, application review, monitoring, and compliance processes by authorizing and encouraging the use of electronic systems for applicant tracking, reporting, and recordkeeping.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, contractors and subcontractors under an ETP agreement may satisfy recordkeeping and documentation requirements requirements, including requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 10206.5, through electronic records, provided that the records are complete, accurate, secure, and accessible for audit and oversight purposes.(c) The panel shall update regulations, guidance, and program materials to remove outdated nomenclature, paper-based procedures, and obsolete training delivery classifications that are inconsistent with current workforce training practices.SEC. 3. Section 10206 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:10206. (a) The panel may allocate money in the fund for any of the following purposes:(1) Reimbursement of reasonable training costs, and administrative costs incurred by contractors. In making a determination of costs to be reimbursed under this paragraph, the panel may allocate funds in accordance with any of the following methods:(A) For purposes of providing simplified fixed-fee performance contracts, a flat rate per hour for categories of training that are substantially similar with respect to content, methodology, and duration, as determined by the panel, not to exceed the reasonable and normal costs for the training. The panel shall periodically adjust the standardized rates established pursuant to this paragraph to reflect changes in training costs.(B) A complete review of the proposal and its costs, including a budget listing the planned costs of training, including personnel, fringe benefits, equipment, supplies, fees for consulting or administrative services, and other costs attributable to training; the services provided by subcontractors; the length and complexity of the training; the method of training; the wages and occupations following training; whether the trainees are new hires or retrainees; and the cost of similar training that the panel has funded previously. The cost of administration shall not exceed 15 percent of the training costs under this paragraph, except that for new hire training the panel may fund administrative costs of up to 25 percent of the training cost.(C) The panel may modify the specific requirements of this paragraph as they apply to employers or contractors proposing projects that involve training for a significant number of small employers in the same project.(D) A contractor is prohibited from utilizing any funds earned or paid as advances or progress payments for the purpose of making payments to any other individual or entity, either directly or indirectly, for costs incurred as a finder’s fee or for other compensation related to the predevelopment or development phase of a training program, which is based on a percentage of the preliminary or final panel award to the contractor for the training project.(2) (A) Costs of program administration incurred under this chapter. These costs shall be reviewed annually by the Department of Finance and the Legislature and determined through the normal budgetary process.(B) The panel’s administrative costs, exclusive of the cost of administering Section 976.6, shall not exceed 15 percent of the total amount annually appropriated for expenditure by the panel. Expenditures for marketing, research, and evaluations provided under the contract to the panel that otherwise would have been provided directly by the panel shall not be included in this limitation.(3) Service related to the purposes of this chapter provided by the Small Business Development Centers.(b) For all training contracts, the panel shall establish requirements for in-kind contributions by either the contractor or the employer that reflect a substantial commitment on the part of the contractor or the employer to the value of the training. In developing these requirements, the panel shall take into account the ability of the contractor or the employer, because of size or financial condition, to make any contribution, and the ability of the Employment Training Fund to meet the demand for training authorized by this chapter. In developing policies regarding in-kind contributions, the panel shall hold public hearings.(c) The panel shall do both of the following:(1) Adopt electronic recordkeeping and training administration standards consistent with modern digital systems, in accordance with Section 10206.5.(2) Ensure that all recordkeeping requirements support program accountability while minimizing unnecessary administrative burden on employers and training providers, in accordance with Section 10206.5.SEC. 4. Section 10206.5 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:10206.5. (a) The panel shall adopt electronic recordkeeping and training administration standards that include, but are not limited to, the following requirements:(1) Contractors shall maintain and make available, upon request by the panel or its designee, all of the following:(A) Electronic records Records that clearly document all aspects of training delivery, trainee participation, and retention outcomes related to the approved training program.(B) Applicable financial records documenting funds received and disbursed under the ETP agreement.(C) Payroll and personnel records related to employees participating in the ETP training agreement.(2) All classroom, laboratory, and videoconference training attendance records shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following elements:(A) Date or dates on which training occurred. For concurrent or continuous training, a start date and end date may be used.(B) Type of training and course title, as identified in the approved curriculum.(C) Number of hours the trainee was in attendance per session or course.(D) Name or names of the trainer or trainers.(E) Name or names of the trainees.(3) All asynchronous, web-based training attendance records shall contain, at a minimum, the following elements:(A) Date the training system was last accessed for the specific course.(B) Type of training and course title, as identified in the approved curriculum.(C) Standard number of hours designated to complete the course.(D) Percentage of the course completed by the trainee.(E) Name of the trainee.(b) Electronic records maintained pursuant to this section shall have the same force and effect as paper records and shall be retained for the period required by the panel.(c) Structured onsite training (SOST) shall not be considered an eligible training delivery methodology for purposes of reimbursement or approval under the Employment Training Panel program.SEC. 5. The Employment Training Panel shall adopt or amend regulations and guidance as necessary to implement this act, including conforming changes to terminology, application materials, compliance procedures, and audit standards, consistent with the purposes of this act.